Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1804
ICF/DD Reimbursement Protection Fund; created; use; allocation; investment.

(1) The ICF/DD Reimbursement Protection Fund is created. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Interest and income earned by the fund shall be credited to the fund.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2014, the department shall use the ICF/DD Reimbursement Protection Fund, including the matching federal financial participation under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, as amended, for purposes of enhancing rates paid under the medical assistance program to intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental disabilities and for an annual contribution to community-based programs for persons with developmental disabilities as specified in subsection (4) of this section, exclusive of the reimbursement paid under the medical assistance program and any other state appropriations to intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental disabilities.

(3) For FY2011-12 through FY2013-14, proceeds from the tax imposed pursuant to section 68-1803 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the ICF/DD Reimbursement Protection Fund for allocation as follows:

(a) First, fifty-five thousand dollars for administration of the fund;

(b) Second, the amount needed to reimburse intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental disabilities for the cost of the tax;

(c) Third, three hundred twelve thousand dollars for community-based services for persons with developmental disabilities;

(d) Fourth, six hundred thousand dollars or such lesser amount as may be available in the fund for non-state-operated intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental disabilities, in addition to any continuation appropriations percentage increase provided by the Legislature to nongovernmental intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental disabilities under the medical assistance program, subject to approval by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the department's annual application amending the medicaid state plan reimbursement methodology for intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental disabilities; and

(e) Fifth, the remainder of the proceeds to the General Fund.

(4) For FY2016-17 and each fiscal year thereafter, the ICF/DD Reimbursement Protection Fund shall be used as follows:

(a) First, fifty-five thousand dollars to the department for administration of the fund;

(b) Second, payment to the intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental disabilities for the cost of the tax;

(c) Third, three hundred twelve thousand dollars, in addition to any federal medicaid matching funds, for payment to providers of community-based services for persons with developmental disabilities;

(d) Fourth, one million dollars to the General Fund; and

(e) Fifth, rebase rates under the medical assistance program in accordance with the medicaid state plan as defined in section 68-907. In calculating rates, the proceeds of the tax provided for in section 68-1803 and not utilized under subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection shall be used to enhance rates in non-state-operated intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental disabilities by increasing the annual inflation factor to the extent allowed to ensure federal financial participation for the department's payments to intermediate care facilities for persons with developmental disabilities.

Laws 2004, LB 841, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB701, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 19;

Laws 2017, LB605, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB376, § 18.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.